Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 9. Disposition.
§ 16.1-281.
Foster care plan.

In any case in which (i) a local board of social services places a child through an agreement with the parents or guardians where legal custody remains with the parents or guardian, or (ii) legal custody of a child is given to a local board of social services or a child welfare agency, the local department of social services or child welfare agency shall prepare a foster care plan for such child, as described hereinafter. The individual family service plan developed by the family assessment and planning team pursuant to §

2.2-5208

may be accepted by the court as the foster care plan if it meets the requirements of this section.

The representatives of such department or agency shall involve in the development of the plan the child’s parent(s), except when parental rights have been terminated or the local department of social services or child welfare agency has made diligent efforts to locate the parent(s) and such parent(s) cannot be located, relatives and fictive kin who are interested in the child’s welfare, and any other person or persons standing in loco parentis at the time the board or child welfare agency obtained custody or the board placed the child. The representatives of such department or agency shall involve a child who is 12 years of age or older in the development of the plan and, at the option of such child, up to two members of the case planning team who are chosen by the child and who are not a foster parent of, or caseworker for, the child. A child under 12 years of age may be involved in the development of the plan if such involvement is consistent with the best interests of the child. In cases where either the parent(s) or child is not involved in the development of the plan, the department or agency shall include in the plan a full description of the reasons therefor.

The department or child welfare agency shall file the plan with the juvenile and domestic relations district court within 45 days following the transfer of custody or the board’s placement of the child unless the court, for good cause shown, allows an extension of time, which shall not exceed an additional 60 days. However, a foster care plan shall be filed in accordance with the provisions of §

16.1-277.01

with a petition for approval of an entrustment agreement. A foster care plan need not be prepared if the child is returned to his prior family or placed in an adoptive home within 45 days following transfer of custody to the board or agency or the board’s placement of the child.

The foster care plan shall describe in writing (i) the programs, care, services and other support which will be offered to the child and his parents and other prior custodians; (ii) the participation and conduct which will be sought from the child’s parents and other prior custodians; (iii) the visitation and other contacts which will be permitted between the child and his parents and other prior custodians, and between the child and his siblings; (iv) the nature of the placement or placements which will be provided for the child, including an assessment of the stability of each placement, the services provided or plans for services to be provided to address placement instability or to prevent disruption of the placement, and a description of other placements that were considered for the child, if any, and reasons why such other placements were not provided; (v) for school-age children, the school placement of the child; (vi) for children 14 years of age and older, the child’s needs and goals in the areas of counseling, education, housing, employment, and money management skills development, along with specific independent living services that will be provided to the child to help him reach these goals; and (vii) for children 14 years and older, an explanation of the child’s rights with respect to education, health, visitation, court participation, and the right to stay safe and avoid exploitation. The foster care plan shall include all documentation specified in 42 U.S.C. § 675(5)(l) and §

63.2-905.3

. If the child in foster care is placed in a qualified residential treatment program as defined in §

16.1-228

, the foster care plan shall also include the report and documentation set forth in subsection A of §

63.2-906.1

. If the child in foster care is pregnant or is the parent of a child, the foster care plan shall also include (a) a list of the services and programs to be provided to or on behalf of the child to ensure parental readiness or capability and (b) a description of the foster care prevention strategy for any child born to the child in foster care. In cases in which a foster care plan approved prior to July 1, 2011, identifies independent living as the goal for the child, and in cases involving children admitted to the United States as refugees or asylees who are 16 years of age or older and for whom the goal is independent living, the plan shall also describe the programs and services which will help the child prepare for the transition from foster care to independent living. If consistent with the child’s health and safety, the plan shall be designed to support reasonable efforts which lead to the return of the child to his parents or other prior custodians within the shortest practicable time which shall be specified in the plan. The child’s health and safety shall be the paramount concern of the court and the agency throughout the placement, case planning, service provision and review process. For a child 14 years of age and older, the plan shall include a signed acknowledgment by the child that the child has received a copy of the plan and that the rights contained therein have been explained to the child in an age-appropriate manner.

If the department or child welfare agency concludes that it is not reasonably likely that the child can be returned to his prior family within a practicable time, consistent with the best interests of the child, the department, child welfare agency or team shall (1) include a full description of the reasons for this conclusion; (2) provide information on the opportunities for placing the child with a relative or in an adoptive home; (3) design the plan to lead to the child’s successful placement with a relative or fictive kin for the purpose of establishing eligibility for the Federal-Funded Kinship Guardianship Assistance program established pursuant to §

63.2-1305

or the State-Funded Kinship Guardianship Assistance program established pursuant to §

63.2-1306

or in an adoptive home within the shortest practicable time; and (4) if neither of such placements is feasible, explain why permanent foster care is the plan for the child or independent living is the plan for the child in cases involving children admitted to the United States as refugees or asylees who are 16 years of age or older and for whom the goal is independent living.

The local board or other child welfare agency having custody of the child shall not be required by the court to make reasonable efforts to reunite the child with a parent if the court finds that (A) the residual parental rights of the parent regarding a sibling of the child have previously been involuntarily terminated; (B) the parent has been convicted of an offense under the laws of the Commonwealth or a substantially similar law of any other state, the United States or any foreign jurisdiction that constitutes murder or voluntary manslaughter, or a felony attempt, conspiracy or solicitation to commit any such offense, if the victim of the offense was a child of the parent, a child with whom the parent resided at the time such offense occurred or the other parent of the child; (C) the parent has been convicted of an offense under the laws of the Commonwealth or a substantially similar law of any other state, the United States or any foreign jurisdiction that constitutes felony assault resulting in serious bodily injury or felony bodily wounding resulting in serious bodily injury or felony sexual assault, if the victim of the offense was a child of the parent or a child with whom the parent resided at the time of such offense; or (D) based on clear and convincing evidence, the parent has subjected any child to aggravated circumstances, or abandoned a child under circumstances which would justify the termination of residual parental rights pursuant to subsection D of §

16.1-283

.

As used in this section:

“Aggravated circumstances”
means torture, chronic or severe abuse, or chronic or severe sexual abuse, if the victim of such conduct was a child of the parent or child with whom the parent resided at the time such conduct occurred, including the failure to protect such a child from such conduct, which conduct or failure to protect: (i) evinces a wanton or depraved indifference to human life, or (ii) has resulted in the death of such a child or in serious bodily injury to such a child.

“Chronic abuse”
or

“chronic sexual abuse”

means recurring acts of physical abuse that place the child’s health, safety and well-being at risk.

“Independent living”
has the meaning set forth in §

63.2-100

.

“Serious bodily injury”
means bodily injury that involves substantial risk of death, extreme physical pain, protracted and obvious disfigurement, or protracted loss or impairment of the function of a bodily member, organ or mental faculty.

“Severe abuse”
or

“severe sexual abuse”

may include an act or omission that occurred only once, but otherwise meets the definition of “aggravated circumstances.”

Within 30 days of making a determination that reasonable efforts to reunite the child with the parents are not required, the court shall hold a permanency planning hearing pursuant to §

16.1-282.1

.

A copy of the entire foster care plan shall be sent by the court to the child, if he is 12 years of age or older; the guardian ad litem for the child, the attorney for the child’s parents or for any other person standing in loco parentis at the time the board or child welfare agency obtained custody or the board placed the child, to the parents or other person standing in loco parentis, and such other persons as appear to the court to have a proper interest in the plan. However, a copy of the plan shall not be sent to a parent whose parental rights regarding the child have been terminated. A copy of the plan shall be sent by the court to the foster parents. A hearing shall be held for the purpose of reviewing and approving the foster care plan. The hearing shall be held within 60 days of (i) the child’s initial foster care placement, if the child was placed through an agreement between the parents or guardians and the local department of social services or a child welfare agency; (ii) the original preliminary removal order hearing, if the child was placed in foster care pursuant to §

16.1-252

; (iii) the hearing on the petition for relief of custody, if the child was placed in foster care pursuant to §

16.1-277.02

; or (iv) the dispositional hearing at which the child was placed in foster care and an order was entered pursuant to §

16.1-278.2

,

16.1-278.3

,

16.1-278.4

,

16.1-278.5

,

16.1-278.6

, or

16.1-278.8

. However, the hearing shall be held in accordance with the provisions of §

16.1-277.01

with a petition for approval of an entrustment agreement. If the judge makes any revision in any part of the foster care plan, a copy of the changes shall be sent by the court to all persons who received a copy of the original of that part of the plan.

The court in which the foster care plan is filed shall be notified immediately if the child is returned to his parents or other persons standing in loco parentis at the time the board or agency obtained custody or the board placed the child.

In cases in which a child is placed by the local board of social services or a licensed child-placing agency in a qualified residential treatment program as defined in §

16.1-228

, a hearing shall be held within 60 days of such placement. Prior to such hearing, the qualified residential treatment program shall file with the court the assessment report prepared pursuant to clause (viii) of the definition of qualified residential treatment program set forth in §

16.1-228

. The court shall (i) consider the assessment report prepared by a qualified individual pursuant to clause (viii) of the definition of qualified residential treatment program set forth in §

16.1-228

and submitted pursuant to this subsection; (ii) consider the report and documentation required under subsection A of §

63.2-906.1

and filed with the foster care or permanency plan; (iii) determine whether the needs of the child can be met through placement in a foster home or, if not, whether placement in the qualified residential treatment program would provide the most effective and appropriate level of care for the child in the least restrictive environment and be consistent with the short-term and long-term goals established for the child in his foster care or permanency plan; and (iv) approve or deny the placement of the child in the qualified residential treatment program. The hearing required by this subsection may be held in conjunction with a dispositional hearing held pursuant to subsection C, a foster care review hearing held pursuant to §

16.1-282

, a permanency planning hearing held pursuant to §

16.1-282.1

, or an annual foster care review hearing held pursuant to §

16.1-282.2

, provided that such hearing has already been scheduled by the court and is held within 60 days of the child’s placement in the qualified residential treatment program.
E. 1. In cases in which a child is placed by the local board of social services or a licensed child-placing agency in a qualified residential treatment program as defined in § 16.1-228, a hearing shall be held within 60 days of such placement. Prior to such hearing, the qualified residential treatment program shall file with the court the assessment report prepared pursuant to clause (viii) of the definition of qualified residential treatment program set forth in § 16.1-228. The court shall (i) consider the assessment report prepared by a qualified individual pursuant to clause (viii) of the definition of qualified residential treatment program set forth in §

16.1-228

and submitted pursuant to this subsection; (ii) consider the report and documentation required under subsection A of §

63.2-906.1

and filed with the foster care or permanency plan; (iii) determine whether the needs of the child can be met through placement in a foster home or, if not, whether placement in the qualified residential treatment program would provide the most effective and appropriate level of care for the child in the least restrictive environment and be consistent with the short-term and long-term goals established for the child in his foster care or permanency plan; and (iv) approve or deny the placement of the child in the qualified residential treatment program. The hearing required by this subsection may be held in conjunction with a dispositional hearing held pursuant to subsection C, a foster care review hearing held pursuant to §

16.1-282

, a permanency planning hearing held pursuant to §

16.1-282.1

, or an annual foster care review hearing held pursuant to §

16.1-282.2

, provided that such hearing has already been scheduled by the court and is held within 60 days of the child’s placement in the qualified residential treatment program.

If the child remains placed in the qualified residential treatment program during any subsequent hearings held pursuant to subsection C or § 16.1-282, 16.1-282.1, or 16.1-282.2, the local board of social services or licensed child-placing agency shall present evidence at such hearing that demonstrates (i) that the ongoing assessment of the child’s strengths and needs continues to support the determination that the child’s needs cannot be met through placement in a foster home and that the child’s placement in the qualified residential treatment program provides the most effective and appropriate level of care for the child in the least restrictive environment and is consistent with the short-term and long-term goals established for the child in his foster care or permanency plan; (ii) the specific treatment or service needs of the child that will be met in the qualified residential treatment program and the length of time the child is expected to need such treatment or services; and (iii) the efforts made by the local board of social services to prepare the child to return home or to be placed with a fit and willing relative, legal guardian, or adoptive parent, or in a foster home. The court shall review such evidence and approve or deny the continued placement of the child in the qualified residential treatment program.

At the conclusion of the hearing at which the initial foster care plan is reviewed, the court shall schedule a foster care review hearing to be held within four months in accordance with §

16.1-282

. However, if an order is entered pursuant to subsection C2, the court shall schedule a foster care review hearing to be held within 12 months of the entry of such order in accordance with the provisions of §

16.1-282.2

. Parties who are present at the hearing at which the initial foster care plan is reviewed shall be given notice of the date set for the foster care review hearing and parties who are not present shall be summoned as provided in §

16.1-263

.

Nothing in this section shall limit the authority of the juvenile judge or the staff of the juvenile court, upon order of the judge, to review the status of children in the custody of local boards of social services or placed by local boards of social services on its own motion. The court shall appoint an attorney to act as guardian ad litem to represent the child any time a hearing is held to review the foster care plan filed for the child or to review the child’s status in foster care.

C1.

Any order transferring custody of the child to a relative other than the child’s prior family shall be entered only upon a finding, based upon a preponderance of the evidence, that the relative is one who, after an investigation as directed by the court, (i) is found by the court to be willing and qualified to receive and care for the child; (ii) is willing to have a positive, continuous relationship with the child; (iii) is committed to providing a permanent, suitable home for the child; and (iv) is willing and has the ability to protect the child from abuse and neglect; and the order shall so state. The court’s order transferring custody to a relative should further provide for, as appropriate, any terms or conditions which would promote the child’s interest and welfare; ongoing provision of social services to the child and the child’s custodian; and court review of the child’s placement.

C2.

Any order entered at the conclusion of the hearing that has the effect of achieving a permanent goal for the child by terminating residual parental rights pursuant to §

16.1-277.01

,

16.1-277.02

,

16.1-278.3

, or

16.1-283

; by placing the child in permanent foster care pursuant to clause (iv) of subsection A of §

16.1-282.1

; or, in cases in which independent living was identified as the goal for a child in a foster care plan approved prior to July 1, 2011, or in which a child has been admitted to the United States as a refugee or asylee and is over 16 years of age and independent living has been identified as the permanency goal for the child, by directing the board or agency to provide the child with services to achieve independent living status, if the child has attained the age of 16 years, pursuant to clause (v) of subsection A of §

16.1-282.1

shall state whether reasonable efforts have been made to place the child in a timely manner in accordance with the foster care plan and to complete the steps necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child.

History.

1977, c. 559; 1978, cc. 732, 740; 1982, c. 171; 1984, c. 373; 1985, c. 210; 1991, c. 98; 1994, cc. 604, 865; 1997, c. 790; 1998, c. 550; 2000, c. 385; 2002, cc. 397, 512, 664, 729, 747; 2005, c. 653; 2008, cc. 397, 475, 483, 678; 2009, c. 80; 2011, cc. 154, 730; 2013, c. 130; 2015, c. 120; 2016, c. 631; 2019, cc. 282, 688; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 535; 2022, c. 305.

Cross references.

As to appointment of counsel for parent or guardian of minor child, see §

16.1-266

.

As to exceptions for certain motor carriers under the Virginia Public Procurement Act to hearings on applications for a license or certificate, see §

46.2-2005

.

As to foster care plans, permissible plan goals, and court review of foster children, see §

63.2-906

.

As to visitation of child placed in foster care, see §

63.2-912

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts
1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts
1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

Acts
2005, c. 653, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Board of Social Services shall amend its home study regulations to allow homes to be dually approved as both foster and adoptive homes.”

The 1998 amendment,

in subsection B, in the the second sentence, added “If consistent with the child’s health and safety” at the beginning and inserted “support reasonable efforts which” following “designed to,” inserted the present third sentence, deleted “However” at the beginning of the former third sentence, redesignated the former third through fifth sentences as the second paragraph, and added the third paragraph; and in subsection C, in the first sentence, substituted “the attorney for the child’s
parents or for any” for “the child’s parents or any” and inserted “to the parents or other person standing in loco parentis,” and in the next-to-last sentence, substituted “§

16.1-252

” for “§

16.1-253

” and inserted “16.1-278.2.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 385 inserted the present next to the last sentence in subsection A; in subsection C, substituted “child, if he is twelve years of age or older; the guardian ad litem” for “attorney” in the first sentence, in the fifth sentence, deleted “or” preceding the clause (iii) designation, redesignated the former clause (iii) language as clause (iv), inserted “the hearing on the petition for relief of custody, if the child was placed in foster care pursuant to §

16.1-277.02

; or” following the clause (iii) designation, and inserted “16.1-278.3” in clause (iv), and inserted the next to the last sentence; and added subsection C1.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 397, in subsection A, deleted “public welfare or” preceding the second and third appearances of “social services” in the first sentence, and in the third sentence substituted “child’s parent(s)” for “child’s parents” and inserted “or the local department of social services or other designated agency has made diligent efforts to locate the parent(s) and such parent(s) cannot be located”; and deleted “public welfare or” preceding the first appearance of “social services” in the first sentence in subsection E (now subsection F).

The 2002 amendment by ch. 512 deleted “public welfare or” preceding the second and third appearances of “social services” in the first sentence in subsection A; in the second paragraph in subsection B, in the first sentence substituted “team concludes” for “team determines,” substituted “provide information on” for “determine” in clause (ii), and deleted “permanent foster care” preceding “or continued foster care” in clause (iv), and substituted “petition” for proper pleading” in the last sentence; inserted subsection C 2; redesignated former subsection E as present subsection F and redesignated former subsection F as present subsection E; in present subsection E, inserted the present second sentence and substituted “at which the initial foster care plan is reviewed” for “pursuant to this section” in the third sentence; and deleted “public welfare or” preceding the first appearance of “social services” in the first sentence in present subsection F.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 664 and 729 are virtually identical, and in subsection B, in the third paragraph, substituted “that” for “which” following “jurisdiction” in clauses (ii) and (iii), deleted “or” preceding clause (iii), inserted “or” at the end of clause (iii) and added clause (iv), and added the definitions of “Aggravated circumstances,” “Chronic abuse,” and “Severe abuse.” In addition, the amendment by c. 664 substituted “that” for “which” in the definition of “serious bodily injury.”

The 2002 amendment by c. 747, effective October 1, 2002, in clause A (ii), deleted “public welfare or” preceding “social services” and substituted “local department of social services” for “department of public welfare or social services”; in subsection B, redesignated former clauses (i) to (iv) as present clauses (a) to (d) in the second paragraph, and redesignated former clauses (i) to (iii) as present clauses (1) to (3) in the third paragraph; and deleted “public welfare or” following the first appearance of “local boards of” in subsection E.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 653, in the first sentence in the second paragraph of subsection A, substituted “shall involve the child’s parent(s) in the development of the plan” for “shall consult with the child’s parent(s)” and deleted “concerning the matters which should be included in such plan” following “child” and added the last two sentences; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 397 inserted “and between the child and his siblings” in clause (iii) of subsection B.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 475 and 483 are identical, and in subsection B, inserted “in writing” preceding the clause (i) designation, inserted clause (v), redesignated former clause (v) as clause (vi), and deleted “in writing and” at the beginning of clause (vi); deleted the former second and third sentences in the second paragraph of subsection B, which read:
“ ‘Independent living’ includes the services and programs needed to assist the child in making a transition from foster care to self-sufficiency. The department or agency may include with such proposed plan a petition seeking the termination of residual parental rights pursuant to §

16.1-283

” and added the present second sentence.

The 2008 amendment by c. 678, in subsection A, in the first paragraph, deleted “or a public agency designated by the community policy and management team” following “board of social services” in clause (i), substituted “or child welfare agency” for “the public agency designated or child welfare agency or the family assessment and planning team established pursuant to §

2.2-5207

” in clause (ii); in the second paragraph, substituted “department or agency” for “department, agency, or team” three times, substituted “child welfare” for “other designated” following “social services or,” deleted “or the public agency” preceding “placed the child” in the first sentence; in the third paragraph, substituted “department or child welfare agency” for “department, public agency, child welfare agency or team” near the beginning of the first sentence, deleted “or public agency’s” preceding “placement of the child” twice; in subsection B, in the second paragraph, substituted “department or child welfare agency” for “department, child welafare agency or team” near the beginning of the first sentence; in subsection C, deleted “or public agency” preceding “placed the child” in the first sentence, deleted “other public agency” preceding “or a child welfare agency” in clause (i); in subsection D, deleted “or public agency” preceding “placed the child”; and in subsection F, deleted “or the public agency designated by the community policy and management team” preceding “on its own motion” in the first sentence.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 80, in clause (d) of the second paragraph in subsection B, inserted “or” following “permanent foster care” and deleted “or continued foster care” following “16 years of age or older.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 154, in subsection B, added clause (v) and redesignated the remaining clauses accordingly.

The 2011 amendment by c. 730, in subsection B, deleted “and (vi) where appropriate for children age 16 or over” at the end of the first sentence, added the language beginning “In cases in which a foster care plan approved prior to July 1, 2011” and ending “whom the goal is independent living, the plan shall also describe” in the second sentence of the first paragraph; rewrote subdivision B(d) in the second paragraph; and rewrote subdivision C 2.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 130, effective July 1, 2014, substituted “45 days” for “60 days” twice in the third paragraph of subsection A; substituted “60 days” for “75 days” in the third sentence of subsection C; and substituted “four months” for “six months” in subsection E.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 120 in the second paragraph in subsection B, deleted “in a separate section of the plan” following “consistent with the best interests of the child”; and deleted “excluding the section of the plan describing the reasons why the child cannot be returned home and the alternative chosen” following “A copy of the plan” in the third sentence in subsection C.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 631, in the second paragraph of subsection A, rewrote the former second sentence, which read: “The representatives of such department or agency shall involve the child in the development of the plan, if such involvement is consistent with the best interests of the child” and divided it into the present second and third sentences; and in the first paragraph of subsection B, added clauses (vii) and (viii) and made a related change, and added the last sentence.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 282 and 688 are identical, and in the first paragraph of subsection B, divided the first sentence into two sentences by substituting “The foster care plan shall include” for “and (viii),” inserted the third and fourth sentences and transferred the definition of “Independent living” from the third paragraph of subsection B to its current location; added subsection E and redesignated former subsections E and F as subsections F and G; and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 535, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection A in the second paragraph, moved “in the development of the plan” from following to preceding “the child’s parent(s),” inserted “relatives and fictive kin who are interested in the child’s welfare,” and substituted “12” for “14” twice; and substituted “or fictive kin for the purpose of establishing eligibility for the Federal-Funded Kinship Guardianship Assistance program established pursuant to §

63.2-1305

or the State-Funded Kinship Guardianship Assistance program established pursuant to §

63.2-1306

” for “if a subsequent transfer of custody to the relative is planned” in subsection B, second paragraph, clause (3).

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 305 inserted “including an assessment of the stability of each placement, the services provided or plans for services to be provided to address placement instability or to prevent disruption of the placement, and a description of other placements that were considered for the child, if any, and reasons why such other placements were not provided” in subsection B in the first paragraph in clause (iv); and made a stylistic change.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia domestic relations law for the year 1977-1978, see 64 Va. L. Rev. 1439 (1978).

For survey of developments in Virginia domestic relations law for year 1979-1980, see 67 Va. L. Rev. 351 (1981).

For an article concerning parents as fiduciaries, see 81 Va. L. Rev. 2401 (1995).

For an article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1345 (1998).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Parent and Child, §§ 7, 11; 17 M.J. Statutes, § 36.